Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska70-608
District; certificate of approval; filing.

The Nebraska Power Review Board shall immediately cause one of the certificates to be forwarded to and filed in the office of the Secretary of State and the other one in the office of the county clerk of the county in which the principal place of business of the district is located. Thereupon such district under its designated name shall be and constitute a body politic and corporate.

Laws 1933, c. 86, § 3, p. 339;

Laws 1937, c. 152, § 3, p. 579;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 70-703;

Laws 1943, c. 145, § 1(6), p. 509;

R.S.1943, § 70-608;

Laws 1981, LB 181, § 12.